Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1357
Crematory; license required.

A crematory shall not be established, operated, or maintained in this state except by a crematory authority licensed by the department under the Cremation of Human Remains Act. The department shall issue a license to a crematory authority that satisfies the requirements for licensure under the act. Human remains shall not be cremated in this state except at a crematory operated by a crematory authority licensed under the act.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1187.